Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6202
Purpose of act.

It is the purpose of the Assumption Reinsurance Act to provide for the regulation of the transfer and novation of contracts of insurance by way of assumption reinsurance. The act describes assumption reinsurance and establishes notice and disclosure requirements which protect and define the rights and obligations of policyholders, regulators, and the parties to assumption reinsurance agreements.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 63.